fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Tiede ja laboratorio > Dissektiopakkaukset: Ammattimaiset dissektiopakkaukset; Harjoitusdissektiopakkaukset
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Věda a laboratoře > Pitevní sady: Profesionální pitevní sady; Výukové pitevní sady
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Ciência e laboratório > Kits de dissecação: Kits de dissecação profissional; Kits de treinamento para dissecação
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Znanost in laboratorij > Kompleti za disekcijo: Profesionalni kompleti za disekcijo; Preizkusni kompleti za disekcijo
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Badania naukowe i laboratoryjne > Zestawy autopsyjne: Profesjonalne zestawy autopsyjne; Szkoleniowe zestawy autopsyjne
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Khoa học & Phòng thí nghiệm > Bộ dụng cụ giải phẫu: Bộ dụng cụ giải phẫu chuyên nghiệp; Bộ dụng cụ giải phẫu dùng cho đào tạo
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Лабораторное и научное оборудование > Наборы препаровальных инструментов: Профессиональные наборы препаровальных инструментов; Учебные наборы препаровальных инструментов
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Znanost i laboratorij > Setovi za disekciju: Profesionalni setovi za disekciju; Setovi za disekciju za obuku
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 科學和實驗室 > 解剖工具組: 專業解剖工具組; 訓練解剖工具組
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Ciência e laboratório > Kits de dissecação: Kits de dissecação profissionais; Kits de dissecação para treino
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Sciences et laboratoire > Kits de dissection: Kits de dissection professionnels; Kits de dissection de formation
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Wetenschap en laboratoriums > Ontleedsets: Professionele ontleedsets; Oefenontleedsets
sv: Företag och industri > Vetenskap och laboratorium > Dissekeringsutrustning: Professionella dissektionsenheter; Utbildningsdissektionsenheter
da: Erhverv og industri > Videnskab og laboratorier > Dissektionssæt: Professionelle dissektionssæt; Dissektionssæt til træning
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Επιστήμη & εργαστήριο > Σετ ανατομίας: Επαγγελματικά σετ ανατομίας; Εκπαιδευτικά σετ ανατομίας
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Mokslas ir laboratorijos > Skrodimo rinkiniai: Profesionalūs skrodimo rinkiniai; Mokomieji skrodimo rinkiniai
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 科学与实验 > 解剖工具包: 专业解剖工具包; 训练用解剖工具包
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Bilim ve Laboratuvar > Diseksiyon Setleri: Profesyonel Diseksiyon Setleri; Eğitim Diseksiyon Setleri
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 과학/연구 > 해부 도구 세트: 전문가용 해부 도구 세트; 교육용 해부 도구 세트
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 科学・実験 > 解剖用具セット: プロ用解剖用具セット; トレーニング用解剖用具セット
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > วิทยาศาสตร์และห้องแล็บ > ชุดผ่าตัด: ชุดผ่าตัดแบบมืออาชีพ; ชุดผ่าตัดสำหรับฝึก
es: Economía e industria > Ciencia y laboratorio > Kits de disección: Kits de disección profesionales; Kits de disección de formación
nb: Forretninger og industri > Vitenskap og laboratorier > Disseksjonssett: Profesjonelle disseksjonssett; Treningsdisseksjonssett
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Știință și laborator > Truse de disecție: Truse profesioniste de disecție; Truse de disecție pentru pregătire
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Vedecké laboratórium > Súpravy na chirurgické zákroky: Profesionálne súpravy na chirurgické zákroky; Cvičné súpravy na chirurgické zákroky
it: Commercio e industria > Scienza e laboratorio > Kit di dissezione: Kit di dissezione professionali; Kit di dissezione per addestramento
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Наука и лаборатория > Комплекти за дисекция: Професионални комплекти за дисекция; Обучителни комплекти за дисекция
en: Business & Industrial > Science & Laboratory > Dissection Kits: Professional Dissection Kits; Training Dissection Kits
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Tudomány és laboratórium > Bonckészletek: Professzionális bonckészletek; Tréning-bonckészletek
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Wissenschaft & Labor > Sezierinstrumente: Professionelle Seziersets; Schulungs-Seziersets